Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 11 Nonadmitted Insurance

§ 26-11-101.
Short title.

This chapter constitutes and may be cited as the “Nonadmitted Insurance Law”.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 208; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-208; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “ ‘Nonadmitted Insurance Law’ ” for “ ‘Surplus Line Law’. ”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-11-102.
Home state regulation of nonadmitted insurance; exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to reinsurance or to the following insurances when placed by licensed insurance producers or surplus lines brokers of this state or when procured directly by an insured from a nonadmitted insurer:

Wet marine and transportation insurance;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 45, § 2.

Insurance on operations of railroads engaged in transportation in interstate commerce and their property used in those operations;

Insurance on aircraft owned or operated by manufacturers of aircraft, or on aircraft operated in commercial interstate flight, or cargo of that aircraft, or against liability, other than worker’s compensation and employer’s liability, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of that aircraft.

The placement of nonadmitted insurance shall be subject to the statutory and regulatory requirements solely of the insured’s home state.

This section shall not be construed to preempt any state law, rule or regulation that restricts the placement of workers’ compensation insurance or excess insurance for self-funded workers’ compensation plans with a nonadmitted insurer.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 209; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-209; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

added “or when procured directly by an insured from a nonadmitted insurer” in the introductory language of (a); and added (b) and (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “licensed insurance producers or surplus lines brokers” for “licensed agents or surplus line brokers”; and repealed (a)(ii), which read “Insurance on subjects located, resident or to be performed wholly outside of this state, or on vehicles or aircraft owned and principally garaged outside this state.”

§ 26-11-103.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Admitted insurer” means an insurer authorized to transact the business of insurance in this state;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 45, § 2.

“Export” means to place surplus lines insurance with a nonadmitted insurer;

“Home state” means as follows:

Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph, “home state” means, with respect to an insured:

The state in which an insured maintains its principal place of business or, in the case of an individual, the individual’s principal residence; or

If one hundred percent (100%) of the insured risk is located out of the state referred to in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph, the state to which the greatest percentage of the insured’s taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

If more than one (1) insured from an affiliated group are named insureds on a single nonadmitted insurance contract, the term “home state” means the home state, as determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, of the member of the affiliated group that has the largest percentage of premium attributed to it under the insurance contract;

When a group policyholder pays one hundred percent (100%) of the premium from its own funds, the term “home state” means the home state, as determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, of the group policyholder. When a group policyholder does not pay one hundred percent (100%) of the premium from its own funds, the term “home state” means the home state, as determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, of the group member.

“Nonadmitted insurance” means any property and casualty, accident and health or sickness or disability insurance permitted to be placed directly or through a surplus lines broker with a nonadmitted insurer eligible to accept the insurance;

“Reciprocal state” means a state that has:

Entered into a nonadmitted insurance compact; or

Otherwise adopted the allocation schedule and reporting forms prescribed by a multistate agreement for nonadmitted insurance.

“Recognized financial institution” means an institution that is organized or licensed under the laws of the United States or any state and is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation;

“Affiliate” means with respect to an insured, any entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with the insured;

“Affiliated group” means any group of entities that are all affiliated;

“Business entity” means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or any other legal entity;

“Control” means an entity has “control” over another entity if:

The entity directly or indirectly or acting through one (1) or more other persons owns, controls or has the power to vote twenty-five percent (25%) or more of any class of voting securities of the entity; or

The entity controls in any manner the election of a majority of directors or trustees of the other entity.

“Independently procured insurance” means insurance procured directly by an insured from an eligible nonadmitted insurer;

“Kind of insurance” means one (1) of the types of insurance required to be reported in the annual statement which is filed with the commissioner by admitted insurers;

“Nonadmitted insurer” means with respect to a state, an insurer not authorized to transact the business of insurance in the state, but does not include a health maintenance organization or a risk retention group as that term is defined in section 2(a)(4) of the Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986, 15 U.S.C. 3901(a)(4);

“Premium tax” means with respect to surplus lines or independently procured insurance coverage, any tax, fee, assessment or other charge imposed by a government entity directly or indirectly based on any payment made as consideration for an insurance contract for such insurance, including premium deposits, assessments, registration fees and any other compensation given in consideration for a contract of insurance;

“Principal place of business” means with respect to determining the home state of the insured:

The state where the insured maintains its headquarters and where the insured’s high-level officers direct, control and coordinate the business’ activities;

If the insured’s high-level officers direct, control and coordinate the business’ activities in more than one (1) state, the state in which the greatest percentage of the insured’s taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated; or

If the insured maintains its headquarters or the insured’s high-level officers direct, control and coordinate the business activities outside of any state, the state to which the greatest percentage of the insured’s taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

“Principal place of residence” means with respect to determining the home state of the insured:

The state where the insured resides for the greatest number of days during a calendar year; or

If the insured’s principal residence is located outside any state, the state to which the greatest percentage of the insured’s taxable premium for that insurance contract is allocated.

“Qualified risk manager” means with respect to a policyholder of commercial insurance, a person who meets all of the requirements set forth by department rule and regulation, which requirements shall be in compliance with the Nonadmitted and Reinsurance Reform Act of 2010 or subsequent similar federal enactment;

“Surplus lines broker” means an individual or business entity which is licensed in a state to sell, solicit or negotiate insurance with nonadmitted insurers;

“Type of insurance” means coverage afforded under the particular policy that is being placed;

“Wet marine and transportation insurance” means:

Insurance upon vessels, crafts, hulls and other interests in them or with relation to them;

Insurance of marine builder’s risks, marine war risks and contracts of marine protection and indemnity insurance;

Insurance of freight and disbursements pertaining to a subject of insurance within the scope of this subsection; and

Insurance of personal property and interests therein, in the course of exportation from or importation into any country, or in the course of transportation coastwise or on inland waters, including transportation by land, water or air from point of origin to final destination, in connection with any and all risks or perils of navigation, transit or transportation, and while being prepared for and while awaiting shipment, and during any incidental delays, transshipment or reshipment, provided, however, that insurance of personal property and interests therein shall not be considered wet marine and transportation insurance if the property has:

Been transported solely by land;

Reached its final destination as specified in the bill of lading or other shipping document; or

The insured no longer has an insurable interest in the property.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 210; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-210; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1991, ch. 97, § 1; 2011, ch. 103, § 2; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), added (a)(i), redesignated former (a)(i) and (a)(ii) as present (a)(ii) and (a)(iii), added (a)(iv) through (a)(vi), and redesignated former (a)(iii) as (a)(vii).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “surplus lines insurance with a nonadmitted insurer” for “in an unauthorized insurer under this surplus line law insurance covering a subject of insurance resident, located or to be performed in Wyoming” in (a)(iii); substituted “subparagraphs (B) and (C)” in the introductory language of (a)(iv)(A); added (a)(iv)(C); substituted “permitted to be placed directly or through a surplus lines broker with a nonadmitted insurer eligible to accept the insurance” for “not licensed to do the business of insurance in this state” in (a)(v); and added (a)(viii) through (xxi).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) substituted “insurer authorized to transact” for “insurer licensed to engage in”; repealed (a)(ii), which read “ ‘Broker’ means a surplus line broker licensed as such under this chapter”; in (a)(v) added “accident and health or sickness or disability” following “casualty”; in (a)(xiv) substituted “not authorized to transact” for “not licensed to engage in” and added “a health maintenance organization or” preceding “a risk retention group”; in (a)(xviii) added “or subsequent similar federal enactment” at the end; and in (a)(xix) deleted “on properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed in a state” following “negotiate insurance.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-11-104.
Conditions for export.

If certain insurance coverages cannot be procured from admitted insurers, those coverages, designated in this chapter as “surplus lines”, may be procured from nonadmitted insurers, subject to the following conditions:

The insurance shall be procured through a licensed surplus lines broker;

The full amount of insurance required is not procurable, after diligent effort has been made by the insurance producer to do so, from among the admitted insurers authorized to transact and actually writing that kind and type of insurance in this state, and the amount of insurance exported shall be only the excess over the amount procurable from admitted insurers. The surplus lines broker shall verify that a properly conducted diligent effort search was performed and documented as prescribed by the commissioner;

The insurance shall not be exported for the purpose of securing advantages either as to:

A lower premium rate than would be accepted by an admitted insurer; or

Terms of the insurance contract.

The insurer is an eligible nonadmitted insurer;

The insurer is authorized to write the kind of insurance in its domiciliary jurisdiction;

All other requirements of this chapter are met.

A surplus lines broker is not required to make a diligent effort search to determine whether the full amount or type of insurance can be obtained from admitted insurers when the broker is seeking to procure or place nonadmitted insurance for an exempt commercial purchaser provided:

The broker procuring or placing the surplus lines insurance has disclosed to the exempt commercial purchaser that such insurance may or may not be available from the admitted market that may provide greater protection with more regulatory oversight; and

The exempt commercial purchaser has subsequently requested in writing for the broker to procure or place such insurance from a nonadmitted insurer.

For purposes of this section, the term “exempt commercial purchaser” means any person purchasing commercial insurance that, at the time of placement, meets the following requirements:

The person employs or retains a qualified risk manager to negotiate insurance coverage;

The person has paid aggregate nationwide commercial property and casualty insurance premiums in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) in the immediately preceding twelve (12) months;

The person meets at least one (1) of the following criteria:

The person possesses a net worth in excess of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00) as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

The person generates annual revenues in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

The person employs more than five hundred (500) full-time or full-time equivalent employees per individual insured or is a member of an affiliated group employing more than one thousand (1,000) employees in the aggregate;

The person is a not-for-profit organization or public entity generating annual budgeted expenditures of at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00) as adjusted pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

The person is a municipality with a population in excess of fifty thousand (50,000) individuals.

Effective on January 1, 2015 and every five (5) years thereafter, the amounts in subparagraphs (A), (B) and (D) of paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage change for such five (5) year period in the consumer price index for all urban consumers published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 211; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-211; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “nonadmitted” for “unauthorized” in the introductory language of (a); added the present last sentence in (a)(ii); and added (a)(iv) through (vi), (b) and (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “admitted insurers” for “authorized insurers”; in (a)(i) substituted “surplus lines broker” for “surplus line broker”; in (a)(ii) added “by the insurance producer” following “has been made,” “admitted” following “among the,” and substituted “type of insurance” for “class of insurance,” and “admitted insurers” for “authorized insurers”; and in (a)(iii)(A) substituted “admitted insurer” for “authorized insurer.”

Cited

in

Gordon v. Spectrum, Inc., 981 P.2d 488,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 26-11-105.
Surplus lines transaction report.

Within forty-five (45) days after placing any surplus line insurance for an insured whose home state is this state, each surplus lines broker shall execute and file a report regarding the insurance coverage which shall be kept confidential by the commissioner, including the following:

The name and address of the insured;

The identity of the insurer or insurers;

A description of the subject and location of the risk;

The amount of premium charged for the insurance;

Tax allocation information detailing the portion of the premium attributable to properties, risks or exposures located in each state; and

Any other information as may be required by the commissioner.

The report shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 212; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-212; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

redesignated the existing provisions as (a); rewrote (a) which read: “At the time of effecting any surplus line insurance the broker shall execute an affidavit in a form the commissioner prescribes or accepts, setting forth facts from which it can be determined whether the insurance is eligible for export under W.S.

26-11-104

. The broker shall file this affidavit with the commissioner within thirty (30) days after the insurance is effected.”; and added (b).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “in the form and manner prescribed” for “on forms prescribed.”

§ 26-11-106.
Open lines for export.

The commissioner, by order, may declare eligible for export generally and without compliance with W.S. 26-11-104(a)(ii) and (iii), any type of insurance coverage or risk for which he finds, after notice and a hearing, that there is not a reasonable or adequate market among admitted insurers either as to acceptance of the risk, contract terms, premium or premium rate. The order shall continue in effect during the existence of the conditions upon which predicated, but subject to the commissioner’s earlier termination.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 45, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 213; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-213; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “W.S. 26-11-104(a)(ii) and (iii)” for “W.S. 26-11-104(a)(i) and

26-11-105

” in (a); in (b), substituted “report” for “memorandum,” substituted “a nonadmitted” for “an unauthorized,” and deleted “relative thereto” after “to the state.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “type of insurance” for “class of insurance,” “after notice and a hearing, that” for “after a hearing of which notice is given to each insurer authorized to transact those classes in this state, that,” and “admitted insurers” for “authorized insurers”; and repealed (b) and (c), which read “(b) The broker shall file with or as directed by the commissioner a report as to each coverage he places in a nonadmitted insurer, in such form and context as the commissioner requires for the identification of the coverage and determination of the tax payable to the state. (c) The broker, or a licensed agent of the authorized insurer or a broker, may also place with authorized insurers any insurance coverage made eligible for export generally under subsection (a) of this section and without regard to rate or form filings which may otherwise be applicable to the authorized insurer. As to coverages placed in an authorized insurer, the premium tax thereon shall be reported and paid by the insurer as required generally under W.S.

26-4-103

.”

§ 26-11-107.
Requirements for eligible nonadmitted insurers; publication of eligible insurers.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 3.

The commissioner may issue an order of ineligibility if he finds or has reason to believe that the insurer:

Does not meet the requirements of this section;

Has without just cause refused to pay claims arising under its contracts in the United States; or

Has otherwise conducted its affairs in such manner as to result in or threaten injury or loss to the insuring public of the United States.

The commissioner may create and maintain a list of all nonadmitted insurers that qualify as eligible nonadmitted insurers in Wyoming. To qualify for inclusion on the list, the nonadmitted insurer shall annually file an application with the commissioner and any other appropriate information as required by the commissioner. This subsection does not obligate the commissioner to determine the actual financial condition or claims practices of any nonadmitted insurer. The status of eligibility, if granted by the commissioner, indicates only that the insurer appears to be sound financially and to have satisfactory claims practices, and that the commissioner has no credible evidence to the contrary. While any such list is in effect the surplus lines broker shall restrict to the insurers listed all surplus line business he places.

A surplus lines broker shall not place coverage with a nonadmitted insurer unless, at the time of placement, the surplus lines broker has determined that the nonadmitted insurer is eligible under this section.

A nonadmitted insurer eligible to place surplus lines insurance or independently procured insurance shall:

Be authorized to write the kind of insurance in its domiciliary jurisdiction;

Have established satisfactory evidence of good repute and financial integrity; and

Be qualified under one (1) of the following subparagraphs:

Have capital and surplus or its equivalent under the laws of its domiciliary jurisdiction which equals the greater of:

The minimum capital and surplus requirements under the law of this state; or

Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000.00).

The requirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be satisfied by an insurer’s possessing less than the minimum capital and surplus upon an affirmative finding of acceptability by the commissioner. The finding shall be based upon such factors as quality of management, capital and surplus of any parent company, company underwriting profit and investment income trends, market availability and company record and reputation within the industry. In no event shall the commissioner make an affirmative finding of acceptability when the nonadmitted insurer’s capital and surplus is less than four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000.00);

For an insurer not domiciled in the United States or its territories, the insurer is listed on the quarterly listing of alien insurers maintained by the NAIC international insurers department.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into a cooperative agreement or interstate agreement or compact to establish additional and alternative nationwide uniform eligibility requirements that shall be applicable to nonadmitted insurers domiciled in another state or territory of the United States.

Insurance policy rate and form filings applicable to admitted insurers do not apply to nonadmitted insurers issuing policies under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 214; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-214; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1991, ch. 97, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 206; 2012, ch. 37, §§ 2, 3; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(ii)(B), substituted “international insurers department” for “nonadmitted insurers information office.”

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (a) and (b) which set out the restrictions and requirements under which brokers could place insurance; substituted “nonadmitted” for “unauthorized” in (d); and added (e) through (g).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) rewrote the first sentence, which read “The commissioner from time to time may publish a list of all surplus lines insurers he deems eligible currently and shall mail a copy of the list to each broker at his office last of record with the commissioner,” added the second sentence, and substituted “the surplus lines broker” for “the broker”; and added (h).

Duty of agent and broker. —

Insurance agent and broker had no duty to notify insured of insurer's insolvency once policy terminated, and insured failed to present evidence that agent and broker acted negligently by knowingly procuring insurance with an unsound carrier. Gordon v. Spectrum, Inc., 981 P.2d 488,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 26-11-108.
Evidence of surplus lines insurance.

Upon placing surplus lines insurance coverage, the surplus lines broker shall promptly issue and deliver to the insured or the producer the policy, or if the policy is not then available, a certificate as described in subsection (f) of this section, cover note, binder or other evidence of the insurance. The certificate described in subsection (f) of this section, cover note, binder or other evidence of insurance shall be executed by the broker and shall show the description and location of the subject of the insurance, coverages including any material limitations other than those in standard forms, a general description of the coverages of the insurance, the premium and rate charged, taxes to be collected from the insured, the name and address of the insured and surplus lines insurer or insurers and the proportion of the entire risk assumed by each and the name and license number of the surplus lines broker.

No broker shall issue or deliver any evidence of insurance or purport to insure or represent that insurance will be or has been written by any nonadmitted insurer, unless the broker has:

The insurer’s prior written authority for the insurance;

Received information from the insurer in the regular course of business that the insurance has been granted; or

Received an insurance policy specifying the insurer has actually issued the insurance and delivered it to the insured.

If after the issuance and delivery of any evidence of insurance there is any change as to the insurer’s identity, or the proportion of the risk assumed by any insurer or any other material change in coverage as stated in the surplus lines broker’s original evidence of insurance or in any other material as to the insurance coverage so evidenced, the surplus lines broker shall promptly issue and deliver to the insured or the original producer an appropriate substitute for, or endorsement of the original document, accurately showing the current status of the coverage and the insurers responsible for the coverage.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 3.

Any surplus lines broker who knowingly or negligently issues a false certificate or other evidence of insurance, or who fails promptly to notify the insured of any material change with respect to the insurance by delivery to the insured of a substitute certificate, cover note, binder or other evidence of insurance as provided in subsection (c) of this section, upon conviction, is subject to the penalty provided by W.S.

26-1-107

or to any greater applicable penalty otherwise provided by law.

As soon as reasonably possible after the placement of the insurance, the surplus lines broker shall deliver a copy of the policy or, if not available, a certificate of insurance to the insured or producer to replace any evidence of insurance previously issued. Each certificate or policy of insurance shall contain or have attached a complete record of all policy insuring agreements, conditions, exclusions, clauses, endorsements or any other material facts that would regularly be included in the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 215; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-215; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, §§ 2, 3.

The 2012 amendment,

rewrote (a) through (c); repealed former (d) which read: “If a policy issued by the insurer is not available upon placement of the insurance and the broker has issued and delivered his certificate as provided in this section, upon the insured's request therefor, the broker, as soon as reasonably possible, shall procure from the insurer its policy evidencing the insurance and deliver the policy to the insured in replacement of the broker's certificate”; in (e), substituted “lines” for “line,” added “or other evidence,” and added “cover note, binder or other evidence of insurance”; and added (f).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-11-109.
Required information on surplus lines contracts; duty to notify insured.

Every new or renewed insurance contract, certificate, cover note or other confirmation of insurance that is procured and delivered as a surplus lines coverage pursuant to this chapter shall have stamped or printed upon it, in at least ten (10) point bold type font, the name and address of the surplus lines broker who procured the coverage, and the following disclosure: “This insurance contract is issued pursuant to the Wyoming Nonadmitted Insurance Laws by an insurer neither licensed by nor under the jurisdiction of the Wyoming Insurance Department. In the event of insolvency of the surplus lines insurer, losses will not be paid by the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association or the Wyoming Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association.”

The insurance producer shall give written notice to every person applying for insurance with a nonadmitted insurer prior to placement. The notice shall provide the disclosure required by subsection (a) of this section and any additional information required by the commissioner. The applicant shall sign and date a copy of the notice acknowledging receipt. The notice shall be in a form acceptable to the commissioner, a signed copy of which shall be maintained by the surplus lines broker with the records of the contract and available for examination by the commissioner.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 45, § 2.

Nothing herein contained shall nullify any agreement by any insurer to provide insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 216; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-216; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a), substituted “lines” for “line,” substituted “or printed upon it, in at least ten (10) point bold type font, the name and address” for “upon it, initialed by or bearing the name,” substituted “the coverage, and” for “it,” and added the present last sentence; and added (b) and (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “Every new or renewed insurance contract, certificate, cover note or other confirmation of insurance that is procured” for “Any insurance contract procured,” “the surplus lines broker” for “the broker,” added “disclosure” following “and the following,” “Nonadmitted” preceding “Insurance Laws,” and “or the Wyoming Life and Health Guarantee Association” at the end; designated and rewrote the introductory language of (b) as (b), which read “No contract of insurance placed by a surplus lines broker under this chapter shall be binding upon the insured and no premium charged shall be due and payable until the surplus lines broker shall have notified the insured in writing, in a form acceptable to the commissioner, a copy of which shall be maintained by the surplus lines broker with the records of the contract and available for possible examination, that”; and repealed (b)(i) and (b)(ii), which read “(i) The insurer with which the surplus lines broker places the insurance is not licensed by this state and is not subject to its supervision; and (ii) In the event of the insolvency of the surplus lines insurer, losses will not be paid by the state insurance guaranty association.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "Insurance Guaranty" for "Guarantee" following "Wyoming Life and Health" in (a).

§ 26-11-110.
Enforceability and validity of nonadmitted insurance.

Insurance contracts procured from nonadmitted insurers in accordance with this chapter are fully valid and enforceable as to all parties and shall be given recognition in all matters and respects to the same effect as like contracts issued by admitted insurers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 217; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-217; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “as surplus line coverage” after “contracts procured.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “nonadmitted insurers” for “unauthorized insurers” and “admitted insurers” for “authorized insurers.”

§ 26-11-111.
Liability of insurer as to losses and unearned premiums; applicability of section to insurers.

As to a surplus line risk which is assumed by a nonadmitted insurer pursuant to this chapter, and if the premium thereon is received by the surplus line broker who placed the insurance, in all questions thereafter arising under the coverage as between the insurer and the insured the insurer is deemed to have received the premium due to it for that coverage. The insurer is liable to the insured for losses covered by the insurance and for unearned premiums which are payable to the insured upon cancellation of the insurance, whether or not the broker is indebted to the insurer with respect to the insurance or for any other cause.

Each nonadmitted insurer assuming a surplus line risk under this chapter subjects itself to the terms of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 218; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-218; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “a nonadmitted” for “an unauthorized” in (a), and made a similar change in (b).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-11-112.
Surplus lines broker's license; authority for issuance; application; fee; applicable law.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 3.

For insureds whose home state is Wyoming, a person shall not procure a contract of surplus lines insurance for the insured with a nonadmitted insurer unless the person possesses a current surplus lines insurance license issued by the commissioner.

The commissioner may issue a resident surplus lines broker license to a qualified holder of a current property and casualty producer license if:

The person has paid the fees set forth in W.S. 26-4-101(a);

The person has submitted or transmitted to the commissioner a completed uniform application;

The individual has taken and passed a written examination in a form prescribed by the commissioner; and

The person has established and continues to maintain an office in this state.

A nonresident person shall receive a nonresident surplus lines broker license pursuant to the requirements of W.S.

26-9-208

.

A business entity acting as a surplus lines broker is required to obtain a surplus lines broker license. In addition to the requirements for licensure set forth in subsections (f) and (g) of this section; before approving the application the commissioner shall find that the business entity has designated a licensed surplus lines broker responsible for the business entity’s compliance with the insurance laws, rules and regulations of this state.

The commissioner may require any documents reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in an application.

The commissioner shall waive any requirements for a nonresident surplus lines license applicant with a valid license from his home state, except the requirements imposed by this section, if the applicant’s home state awards nonresident surplus lines licenses to residents of this state on the same basis.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 19, § 2.

The license and licensee are subject to chapter 9 of this title as provided in W.S.

26-9-201

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 219; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-219; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2; 2011, ch. 103, § 2; 2012, ch. 37, §§ 2, 3; 2019 ch. 19, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (e).

The 2012 amendment,

repealed former (a) through (d) which read: “Any person may be licensed as a surplus line broker if: (i) He is licensed as a property and casualty agent; (ii) The commissioner deems him to be competent and trustworthy with respect to the handling of surplus lines; and (iii) He maintains an office at a designated location known to and accessible by the commissioner. (b) Application for the license shall be made to the commissioner on forms he designates and furnishes. (c) The license fee shall be as specified in W.S.

26-4-101

. (d) The license and licensee are subject to chapter 9 of this code as provided in W.S.

26-9-201

.”; and added (f) through (n).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (m), which read: "A business entity surplus lines broker license shall expire on March 31 in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license, and an application for renewal shall be filed on or before the license expiration date upon payment of the continuation fee and compliance with other provisions of this section."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.